Hawaii, session 2026, HB2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that residents and visitors frequently travel between East Hawaii island and West Hawaii island, particularly the areas of Hilo and Kona, for employment, education, medical services, commerce, and tourism.  However, the limited availability of efficient, reliable, and affordable transportation options presents challenges to economic development, community connectivity, and access to essential services. The legislature further finds that a dedicated evaluation of potential transportation routes, including demand response transit, route expansions, and multimodal corridor improvements would help provide long‑term transportation solutions for the island of Hawaii. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a pilot program within the department of business, economic development, and tourism to study and implement transportation options that link the areas of Hilo and Kona. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a Hilo-Kona transportation pilot program within the department of business, economic development, and tourism to study, plan, evaluate, implement, and trial transportation routes and services connecting Hilo and Kona. (b)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall consider a range of mobility and route options, including direct routes, express routes, publicprivate partnerships, shuttle systems, micro transit, and multimodal corridor improvements. (c)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may consult and collaborate with federal agencies, all departments of the State and its political subdivisions that offer transportation related services, community organizations, planners, and other stakeholders. (d)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________